Maryland, session 2026, HB1132.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Real Property
11–135.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, a contract for the resale of
a unit by a unit owner other than a developer is not enforceable unless the contract of sale
contains in conspicuous type a notice in the form specified in subsection (g)(1) of this
section, and the unit owner furnishes to the purchaser [not later than 15 days prior to
closing] WITHIN 20 CALENDAR DAYS AFTER ENTERING INTO THE CONTRACT:
(1) A copy of the declaration (other than the plats);
(2) The bylaws;
(3) The rules or regulations of the condominium;
(4) A certificate containing:
(i) A statement disclosing the effect on the proposed conveyance of
any right of first refusal or other restraint on the free alienability of the unit other than
any restraint created by the unit owner;
(ii) A statement setting forth the amount of the common expense
assessment and any unpaid common expense or special assessment adopted by the council
of unit owners that is due and payable from the selling unit owner;
(iii) A statement of any other fees payable by the unit owners to the
council of unit owners;
(iv) A statement of any capital expenditures approved by the council
of unit owners planned at the time of the conveyance which are not reflected in the current
operating budget disclosed under item (vi) of this item;
(v) The most recent regularly prepared balance sheet and income
expense statement, if any, of the condominium;
(vi) The current operating budget of the condominium including the
current reserve study report or a summary of the report, a statement of the status and
amount of any reserve or replacement fund, or a statement that there is no reserve fund;
(vii) A statement of any unsatisfied judgments or pending lawsuits to
which the council of unit owners is a party, excluding assessment collection suits;

HOUSE BILL 1132 3
(viii) A statement generally describing any insurance policies provided
for the benefit of unit owners, a notice that copies of the policies are available for inspection,
stating the location at which the copies are available, and a notice that the terms of the
policy prevail over the description;
(ix) A statement as to whether the council of unit owners has actual
knowledge of any violation of the health or building codes with respect to the common
elements of the condominium;
(x) A description of any recreational or other facilities which are to
be used by the unit owners or maintained by them or the council of unit owners, and a
statement as to whether or not they are to be a part of the common elements; and
(xi) 1. A statement as to whether the council of unit owners has
entered into any agreement that settles or releases the council of unit owners’ claims
related to common element warranties under § 11–131 of this title; and
2. A statement as to whether the board of directors has
disclosed to the council of unit owners in accordance with § 11–134.1(c)(2) of this title, the
board’s intention to enter into an agreement for the purpose of settling a disputed common
element warranty claim under § 11–131 of this title;
(5) A statement by the unit owner as to whether the unit owner has
knowledge:
(i) That any alteration to the unit or to the limited common
elements assigned to the unit violates any provision of the declaration, bylaws, or rules and
regulations;
(ii) Of any violation of the health or building codes with respect to
the unit or the limited common elements assigned to the unit;
(iii) That the unit is subject to an extended lease under § 11–137 of
this title or under local law, and if so, a copy of the lease must be provided; and
(iv) Of the presence of asbestos in the unit, including a description of
the location of the asbestos, and whether abatement has been performed in the unit during
the occupancy of the owner; [and]
(6) A written notice of the unit owner’s responsibility for the council of unit
owners’ property insurance deductible and the amount of the deductible; AND
(7) A WRITTEN NOTICE OF ANY CHANGE IN MANDATORY FEES OR
PAYMENTS EXCEEDING 10% OF THE AMOUNT PREVIOUSLY STATED TO EXIST OR ANY
OTHER SUBSTANTIAL AND MATERIAL CHANGE TO A DISCLOSURE REQUIRED UNDER
THIS SUBSECTION AFTER IT BECOMES KNOWN TO THE SELLER.

HOUSE BILL 1132
(b) A contract for the resale by a unit owner other than a developer of a unit in a
condominium containing less than 7 units is not enforceable unless the contract of sale
contains in conspicuous type a notice in the form specified in subsection (g)(2) of this
section, and the unit owner furnishes to the purchaser [not later than 15 days prior to
closing] WITHIN 20 CALENDAR DAYS AFTER ENTERING INTO THE CONTRACT:
(1) A copy of the declaration (other than the plats);
(2) The bylaws;
(3) The rules and regulations of the condominium;
(4) A statement by the unit owner of the unit owner’s expenses during the
preceding 12 months relating to the common elements; and
(5) A written notice of the unit owner’s responsibility for the council of unit
owners’ property insurance deductible and the amount of the deductible.
(c) (1) (I) [Except as provided in paragraph (4) of this subsection, the] THE
council of unit owners, within [20] 10 days after a written request by a unit owner and
receipt of a reasonable fee therefor, not to exceed the cost to the council of unit owners, if
any, up to a maximum of [$250] $100, shall furnish a certificate containing the information
necessary to enable the unit owner to comply with subsection (a) of this section.
(II) A unit owner providing a certificate under subsection (a) of this
section is not liable to the purchaser for any erroneous information provided by the council
of unit owners and included in the certificate.
(2) In addition to the fee under paragraph (1) of this subsection, the council
of unit owners [is entitled to a] MAY CHARGE ONLY THE FOLLOWING FEES:
(I) A reasonable fee not to exceed $100 for an inspection of the unit
owner’s unit, if required;
(II) A REASONABLE FEE NOT TO EXCEED $50 FOR DELIVERY OF
THE CERTIFICATE WITHIN 5 DAYS AFTER THE REQUEST FOR THE CERTIFICATE; OR
(III) A REASONABLE FEE NOT TO EXCEED $50 FOR A FINANCIAL
UPDATE ORDERED BY A SETTLEMENT AGENT.
[(3) In addition to the fees under paragraphs (1) and (2) of this subsection,
the council of unit owners is entitled to a reasonable fee:
(i) Not to exceed $50 for delivery of the certificate within 14 days
after the request for the certificate; and

HOUSE BILL 1132 5
(ii) Not to exceed $100 for delivery of the certificate within 7 days
after the request for the certificate.
(4) (i) The Department of Housing and Community Development shall
adjust the maximum fee authorized under paragraph (1) of this subsection every 2 years,
beginning October 1, 2018, to reflect any aggregate increase in the Consumer Price Index
for All Urban Consumers (CPI–U) for the Washington Metropolitan Area, or any successor
index, for the previous 2 years.
(ii) The Department of Housing and Community Development shall
maintain on its website a list of the maximum fees authorized under paragraph (1) of this
subsection as adjusted every 2 years in accordance with subparagraph (i) of this
paragraph.]
[(5)] (3) With respect to the remaining information that the unit owner is
required to disclose under subsection (a) of this section that is not provided by the council
of unit owners and included in the certificate, a unit owner:
(i) Except as provided in item (ii) of this paragraph, is liable to the
purchaser under this section for damages proximately caused by:
1. An untrue statement about a material fact; and
2. An omission of a material fact that is necessary to make
the statements made not misleading, in light of the circumstances under which the
statements were made; and
(ii) Is not liable to the purchaser under this section if the owner had,
after reasonable investigation, reasonable grounds to believe, and did believe, at the time
the information was provided to the purchaser, that the statements were true and that
there was no omission to state a material fact necessary to make the statements made not
misleading, in light of the circumstances under which the statements were made.
11B–106.
(a) A contract for the resale of a lot within a development, or for the initial sale of
a lot within a development containing 12 or fewer lots, to a member of the public who
intends to occupy or rent the lot for residential purposes, is not enforceable by the vendor
unless:
(1) The purchaser is given, on or before entering into the contract for the
sale of [such] THE lot, or within 20 calendar days of entering into the contract NOT LATER
THAN 15 DAYS BEFORE CLOSING, the disclosures set forth in subsection (b) of this section;

HOUSE BILL 1132
(2) The purchaser is given any changes in mandatory fees and payments
exceeding 10 percent of the amount previously stated to exist and any other substantial
and material amendment to the disclosures after they become known to the vendor; and
(3) The contract of sale contains a notice in conspicuous type, which shall
include bold and underscored type, in a form substantially the same as the following:
“This sale is subject to the requirements of the Maryland Homeowners Association
Act (the “Act”). The Act requires that the seller disclose to you at or before the time the
contract is entered into, or within 20 calendar days of entering into the contract NOT LATER
THAN 15 DAYS BEFORE CLOSING, certain information concerning the development in
which the lot you are purchasing is located. The content of the information to be disclosed
is set forth in § 11B–106(b) of the Act (the “MHAA information”) as follows:
(The notice shall include at this point the text of § 11B–106(b) in its entirety).
If you have not received all of the MHAA information [5] 7 5 calendar days or more
before entering into the contract, you have [5] 7 5 calendar days to cancel this contract
after receiving all of the MHAA information. You must cancel the contract in writing, but
you do not have to state a reason. The seller must also provide you with notice of any
changes in mandatory fees exceeding 10% of the amount previously stated to exist and
copies of any other substantial and material amendment to the information provided to
you. You have 3 calendar days to cancel this contract after receiving notice of any changes
in mandatory fees, or copies of any other substantial and material amendment to the
MHAA information which adversely affects you. If you do cancel the contract you will be
entitled to a refund of any deposit you made on account of the contract. However, unless
you return the MHAA information to the seller when you cancel the contract, the seller
may keep out of your deposit the cost of reproducing the MHAA information, or $100,
whichever amount is less.
By purchasing a lot within this development, you will automatically be subject to
various rights, responsibilities, and obligations, including the obligation to pay certain
assessments to the homeowners association within the development. The lot you are
purchasing may have restrictions on:
(1) Architectural changes, design, color, landscaping, or appearance;
(2) Occupancy density;
(3) Kind, number, or use of vehicles;
(4) Renting, leasing, mortgaging, or conveying property;
(5) Commercial activity; or
(6) Other matters.

HOUSE BILL 1132 7
You should review the MHAA information carefully to ascertain your rights,
responsibilities, and obligations within the development.”
(c) (1) [Except as provided in paragraph (4) of this subsection, within 20]
WITHIN 10 days after a written request by a lot owner other than a declarant and receipt
of a reasonable fee, not to exceed the cost to the homeowners association, if any, up to a
maximum of [$250] $100, the homeowners association, the management agent of the
homeowners association, or any other authorized officer or agent of the homeowners
association, shall provide the information listed under subsection (b) of this section.
(2) In addition to the fee under paragraph (1) of this subsection, the
homeowners association [is entitled to a] MAY CHARGE ONLY THE FOLLOWING FEES:
(I) A reasonable fee not to exceed $50 for an inspection of the lot
owner’s lot if the inspection is required by the governing documents of the homeowners
association;
(II) A REASONABLE FEE NOT TO EXCEED $50 FOR DELIVERY OF
THE CERTIFICATE DISCLOSURE INFORMATION WITHIN 5 DAYS AFTER THE REQUEST
FOR THE CERTIFICATE DISCLOSURE INFORMATION; AND
(III) A REASONABLE FEE NOT TO EXCEED $50 FOR A FINANCIAL
UPDATE ORDERED BY A SETTLEMENT AGENT.
[(3) In addition to the fees under paragraphs (1) and (2) of this subsection,
the homeowners association is entitled to a reasonable fee:
(i) Not to exceed $50 for delivery of the information within 14 days
after the request for the information; and
(ii) Not to exceed $100 for delivery of the information within 7 days
after the request for the information.
(4) (i) The Department of Housing and Community Development shall
adjust the maximum fee authorized under paragraph (1) of this subsection every 2 years,
beginning on October 1, 2018, to reflect any aggregate increase in the Consumer Price Index
for All Urban Consumers (CPI–U) for the Washington Metropolitan Area, or any successor
index, for the previous 2 years.
(ii) The Department of Housing and Community Development shall
maintain on its website a list of the maximum fees authorized under paragraph (1) of this
subsection as adjusted every 2 years in accordance with subparagraph (i) of this
paragraph.]
11B–108.

HOUSE BILL 1132
(b) (1) Any purchaser who has not received all of the disclosures required
under § 11B–105 or § 11B–106 of this title, as applicable, [5] 7 5 calendar days or more
before the contract was entered into, within [5] 7 5 calendar days following receipt by the
purchaser of the disclosures required by § 11B–105(a) and (b) or § 11B–106(a) and (b) of
this title, as applicable, may cancel in writing the contract without stating a reason and
without liability on the part of the purchaser.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.